Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.13
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; value; failure to agree; petition; elect to remove and harvest; notice.

If the value to the land of any permitted improvements or growing crops cannot be agreed upon, either the board or the lessee may file a petition in the county court of the county wherein the land is situated to have the value to the land of the permitted improvements and growing crops determined. Prior to the filing of such petition the lessee shall have the right, by filing written notice with the board, to elect to remove prior to the expiration of the lease any permitted structural improvements, owned by him, which can be removed without damage to the land or other permitted improvements located on the land. The lessee shall also have the right, by filing written notice with the board, to elect to harvest any fall-seeded growing grain crops in lieu of compensation for the same.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 4, p. 1453;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 5.